Maryland, session 2026, SB0117.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
9–210.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Cohabitant” means an individual who for a period of at least 180 days
in the year before the death of a fallen public safety officer or judicial officer:
(i) had a relationship of mutual interdependence with the fallen
public safety officer or judicial officer; and
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0117*

SENATE BILL 117
(ii) resided with the fallen public safety officer or judicial officer in
the dwelling.
(3) “Disabled public safety officer or judicial officer” means an individual
who:
(i) has been found to be permanently and totally disabled by an
administrative body or court of competent jurisdiction authorized to make such a
determination; and
(ii) became disabled:
1. as a result of or in the course of employment as a law
enforcement officer, a correctional officer, or a judicial officer; or
2. while in active service as a judicial officer or while in the
active service of a fire, rescue, or emergency medical service, unless the disability was the
result of the individual’s own willful misconduct or abuse of alcohol or drugs.
(4) (i) “Dwelling” means real property that:
1. is the legal residence of a disabled public safety officer or
judicial officer, a surviving spouse, or a cohabitant; and
2. is occupied by not more than two families.
(ii) “Dwelling” includes the lot or curtilage and structures necessary
to use the real property as a residence.
(5) “Fallen public safety officer or judicial officer” means an individual who
dies:
(i) as a result of or in the course of employment as a law enforcement
officer, a correctional officer, or a judicial officer; or
(ii) while in active service as a judicial officer or while in the active
service of a fire, rescue, or emergency medical service, unless the death was the result of
the individual’s own willful misconduct or abuse of alcohol or drugs.
(6) “Public safety officer” means a correctional officer, a law enforcement
officer, or a member of a fire, rescue, or emergency medical service, as those terms are
defined, by law, by the county or municipal corporation as required under subsection (c) of
this section.
(7) (I) “Surviving spouse” means a surviving spouse[, who has not
remarried,] of a fallen public safety officer or judicial officer.

SENATE BILL 117 3
(II) “SURVIVING SPOUSE” INCLUDES AN INDIVIDUAL WHO HAS
REMARRIED.
(b) The Mayor and City Council of Baltimore City or the governing body of a
county or municipal corporation may grant, by law, a property tax credit under this section
against the county or municipal corporation property tax imposed on a dwelling that is
owned by a disabled public safety officer or judicial officer, a surviving spouse, or a
cohabitant:
(1) if the dwelling was owned by the disabled public safety officer or judicial
officer at the time the public safety officer or judicial officer was adjudged to be permanently
and totally disabled or by the fallen public safety officer or judicial officer at the time of the
fallen public safety officer’s or judicial officer’s death;
(2) if the disabled public safety officer or judicial officer was domiciled in
the State as of, or any time within the 5 years before, the date the disabled public safety
officer or judicial officer was adjudged to be permanently and totally disabled or the fallen
public safety officer or judicial officer, the surviving spouse, or the cohabitant was domiciled
in the State as of, or any time within the 5 years before, the date of the fallen public safety
officer’s or judicial officer’s death and the dwelling was acquired by the disabled public
safety officer or judicial officer within 10 years of the date the disabled public safety officer
or judicial officer was adjudged to be permanently and totally disabled or by the surviving
spouse or cohabitant within 10 years of the fallen public safety officer’s or judicial officer’s
death;
(3) if the dwelling was owned by the surviving spouse or cohabitant at the
time of the fallen public safety officer’s or judicial officer’s death; or
(4) if the dwelling was acquired after the disabled public safety officer or
judicial officer, the surviving spouse, or the cohabitant qualified for a credit for a former
dwelling under item (1), (2), or (3) of this subsection, to the extent of the previous credit.
(c) A county or municipal corporation:
(1) shall define, by law, who is a:
(i) public safety officer; and
(ii) judicial officer; and
(2) may provide, by law, for:
(i) the amount and duration of a property tax credit allowed under
this section;
(ii) any additional limitation to the number of years the dwelling was
acquired within the date of an adjudication of disability or death; and

SENATE BILL 117
(iii) any other provision necessary to carry out the provisions of this
section.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after June 30, 2026.